Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 2. Fees

§ 33-1-201.
Fees generally.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by statute, a board or commission authorized to establish examination, inspection, permit or license fees for any profession or occupation regulated under this title or under title 23 shall establish those fees in accordance with the following:

Fees shall be established by rule or regulation promulgated in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Fees shall be established in an amount to ensure that, to the extent practicable, the total revenue generated from the fees collected approximates, but does not exceed, the direct and indirect costs of administering the regulatory provisions required for the profession or occupation under this title;

The board or commission shall maintain records sufficient to support the fees charged.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 56, § 1; 1998, ch. 59, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 33-1-202.
Disposition of fees and interest.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by statute:

All fees and monies received and collected by the boards or commissions under this title and under W.S. 11-25-201(d), 21-2-802(d) and 23-2-414(d) shall be deposited into the state treasury and credited to each board’s or commission’s respective account as created by statute;

The interest on all fees and monies collected by the boards or commissions under this title and under W.S. 11-25-201(d), 21-2-802(d) and 23-2-414(d) shall be credited as follows:

An amount equal to the first fifty percent (50%) of the interest earned from the previous year shall be deposited into an account within the enterprise fund to be used to fund legal services provided to the boards and commissions by the attorney general; and

The remainder of the interest shall be deposited in each board’s or commission’s respective account as created by statute.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 88, § 1; 2021 ch. 109, § 2, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

substituted "11-25-201(d)" for "11-25-105(d)" in (a)(i) and (a)(ii).

Laws 2021, ch. 109, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.